Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Rescue Squads — Rescue Aid Program. [Repealed]

39.700.
Rescue squads — Rescue squad taxing districts. [Repealed.]

39.710.
Rescue Aid Program — Purpose. [Repealed.]

39.720.
Rescue aid fund — State officials’ duties — Local officials’ duties. [Repealed.]

39.730.
Requirements for rescue grant funding — Written standard operating procedures — Bylaws — Rescue vehicle — Membership — Training — Affiliation — Service fee prohibited. [Repealed.]

39.740.
Rescue and project funding — Application and review process. [Repealed.]

39.750.
Purchase, disposal and inspection of equipment — Audit of funds. [Repealed.]

39.760.
Reports of lost, stolen or damaged equipment, or loss of capability to operate — Quarterly incident and training reports — Cumulative list of equipment. [Repealed.]

39.770.
Workers’ compensation coverage — Limitation on — Enrollment. [Repealed.]

39.780.
Procedures for rescue squad taxing districts. [Repealed.]